Texas statutes.
CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

TITLE 1. CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

CHAPTER 40. NEW TRIALS

Art. 40.001. NEW TRIAL ON MATERIAL EVIDENCE. A new trial shall be granted an accused where material evidence favorable to the accused has been discovered since trial.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 900, Sec. 11.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.